Illinois, session 104th, SB1421.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Pension Code is amended by 5changing Sections 13-207, 13-310, and 13-706 as follows: 6    (40 ILCS 5/13-207)  (from Ch. 108 1/2, par. 13-207)7    Sec. 13-207. "Salary": The salary paid to an employee for 8service to the District or to the Board, including salary paid 9for vacation and sick leave and any amounts deferred under a 10deferred compensation plan established under this Code, but 11excluding (1) payment for unused vacation or sick leave, (2) 12overtime pay, (3) termination pay, and (4) any compensation in 13the form of benefits other than the salary. Salary for a member 14on a disability benefit is the salary on which the disability 15benefit is based. 16(Source: P.A. 90-12, eff. 6-13-97.) 17    (40 ILCS 5/13-310)  (from Ch. 108 1/2, par. 13-310)18    Sec. 13-310. Ordinary disability benefit. 19    (a) Any employee who becomes disabled as the result of any 20cause other than injury or illness incurred in the performance 21of duty for the employer or any other employer, or while 22engaged in self-employment activities, shall be entitled to an   SB1421- 2 -LRB104 07674 RPS 17718 b1ordinary disability benefit. The eligible period for this 2benefit shall be 25% of the employee's total actual service 3prior to the date of disability with a cumulative maximum 4period of 5 years.5    (b) The benefit shall be allowed only if the employee 6files an application in writing with the Board that includes , 7and a medical report is submitted by at least one licensed 8health care professional and the employee is examined, at 9least annually, by a licensed health care professional 10appointed by the Board as part of the employee's application.11    The benefit is not payable for any disability which begins 12during any period of unpaid leave of absence. No benefit shall 13be allowed for any period of disability prior to 30 days before 14application is made, unless the Board finds good cause for the 15delay in filing the application. The benefit shall not be paid 16during any period for which the employee receives or is 17entitled to receive any part of salary.18    The benefit is not payable for any disability which begins 19during any period of absence from duty other than allowable 20vacation time in any calendar year. An employee whose 21disability begins during any such ineligible period of absence 22from service may not receive benefits until the employee 23recovers from the disability and is in service for at least 15 24consecutive working days after such recovery.25    In the case of an employee who first enters service on or 26after June 13, 1997, an ordinary disability benefit is not   SB1421- 3 -LRB104 07674 RPS 17718 b1payable for the first 3 days of disability that would 2otherwise be payable under this Section if the disability does 3not continue for at least 11 additional days.4    Beginning on August 18, 2005 (the effective date of Public 5Act 94-621) this amendatory Act of the 94th General Assembly, 6an employee who first entered service on or after June 13, 1997 7is also eligible for ordinary disability benefits on the 31st 8day after the last day worked, provided all sick leave is 9exhausted. 10    (c) The benefit shall be 50% of the employee's salary at 11the date of disability, and shall terminate when the earliest 12of the following occurs:13        (1) The employee returns to work or receives a 14    retirement annuity paid wholly or in part under this 15    Article;16        (2) The disability ceases;17        (3) The employee willfully and continuously refuses to 18    follow medical advice and treatment to enable the employee 19    to return to work. However, this provision does not apply 20    to an employee who relies in good faith on treatment by 21    prayer through spiritual means alone in accordance with 22    the tenets and practice of a recognized church or 23    religious denomination, by a duly accredited practitioner 24    thereof;25        (4) The employee (i) refuses to submit to a reasonable 26    physical examination within 30 days of application by a   SB1421- 4 -LRB104 07674 RPS 17718 b1    licensed health care professional appointed by the Board, 2    (ii) in the case of chronic alcoholism, the employee 3    refuses to join a rehabilitation program licensed by the 4    Department of Public Health of the State of Illinois and 5    certified by the Joint Commission on the Accreditation of 6    Hospitals, (iii) fails or refuses to consent to and sign 7    an authorization allowing the Board to receive copies of 8    or to examine the employee's medical and hospital records, 9    or (iv) fails or refuses to provide complete information 10    regarding any other employment for compensation he or she 11    has received since becoming disabled; or12        (5) The eligibility eligible period for this benefit 13    has been exhausted.14    The first payment of the benefit shall be made not later 15than one month after the same has been granted, and subsequent 16payments shall be made at least monthly.17(Source: P.A. 102-210, eff. 7-30-21; 103-523, eff. 1-1-24; 18revised 7-17-24.) 19    (40 ILCS 5/13-706)  (from Ch. 108 1/2, par. 13-706)20    Sec. 13-706. Board powers and duties. The Board shall have 21the powers and duties set forth in this Section, in addition to 22such other powers and duties as may be provided in this Article 23and in this Code:24        (a) To supervise collections. To see that all amounts 25    specified in this Article to be applied to the Fund, from   SB1421- 5 -LRB104 07674 RPS 17718 b1    any source, are collected and applied.2        (b) To notify of deductions. To notify the Clerk of 3    the Water Reclamation District of the deductions to be 4    made from the salaries of employees.5        (c) To accept gifts. To accept by gift, grant, bequest 6    or otherwise any money or property of any kind and use the 7    same for the purposes of the Fund.8        (d) To invest the reserves. To invest the reserves of 9    the Fund in accordance with the provisions set forth in 10    Section 1-109, 1-109.1, 1-109.2, 1-110, 1-111, 1-114, and 11    1-115 of this Code. Investments made in accordance with 12    Section 1-113 of Article 1 of this Code shall be deemed 13    prudent. The Board is also authorized to transfer 14    securities to the Illinois State Board of Investment for 15    the purpose of participation in any commingled investment 16    fund as provided in Article 22A of this Code.17        (e) To authorize payments. To consider and pass upon 18    all applications for annuities and benefits; to authorize 19    or suspend the payment of any annuity or benefit; to 20    inquire into the validity and legality of any grant of 21    annuity or benefit paid from or payable out of the Fund; to 22    increase, reduce, or suspend any such annuity or benefit 23    whenever the annuity or benefit, or any part thereof, was 24    secured or granted, or the amount thereof fixed, as the 25    result of misrepresentation, fraud, or error. No such 26    annuity or benefit shall be permanently reduced or   SB1421- 6 -LRB104 07674 RPS 17718 b1    suspended until the affected annuitant or beneficiary is 2    first notified of the proposed action and given an 3    opportunity to be heard. No trustee of the Board shall 4    vote upon that trustee's own personal claim for annuity, 5    benefit or refund, or participate in the deliberations of 6    the Board as to the validity of any such claim. The Board 7    shall have exclusive original jurisdiction in all matters 8    of claims for annuities, benefits and refunds.9        (f) To submit an annual report. To submit a report in 10    July of each year to the Board of Commissioners of the 11    Water Reclamation District as of the close of business on 12    December 31st of the preceding year. The report shall 13    include the following: 14            (1) A balance         sheet, showing the financial and 15        actuarial condition of the Fund as of the end of the 16        calendar year; 17            (2) A statement of receipts and disbursements 18        during such year; 19            (3) A statement showing changes in the asset, 20        liability, reserve and surplus accounts during such 21        year; 22            (4) A detailed statement of investments as of the 23        end of the year; and 24            (5) Any additional information as is deemed 25        necessary for proper interpretation of the condition 26        of the Fund.  SB1421- 7 -LRB104 07674 RPS 17718 b1        (g) To subpoena witnesses and compel the production of 2    records. To issue subpoenas to compel the attendance of 3    witnesses to testify before the Board and to compel the 4    production of documents and records upon any matter 5    concerning the Fund, including, but not limited to, in 6    conjunction with:7            (1) a disability claim;8            (2) an administrative review proceeding;9            (3) an attempt to obtain information to assist in 10        the collection of sums due to the Fund;11            (4) obtaining any and all personal identifying 12        information necessary for the administration of 13        benefits;14            (5) the determination of the death of a benefit 15        recipient or a potential benefit recipient; or16            (6) a felony forfeiture investigation.17    The fees of witnesses for attendance and travel shall be 18the same as the fees of witnesses before the circuit courts of 19this State and shall be paid by the party seeking the subpoena. 20The Board may apply to any circuit court in the State for an 21order requiring compliance with a subpoena issued under this 22Section. Subpoenas issued under this Section shall be subject 23to the applicable provisions of the Code of Civil Procedure. 24The President or other members of the Board may administer 25oaths to witnesses. To compel witnesses to attend and testify 26before it upon any matter concerning the Fund and allow   SB1421- 8 -LRB104 07674 RPS 17718 b1witness fees not in excess of $6 for attendance upon any one 2day. The President and other members of the Board may 3administer oaths to witnesses.4        (h) To appoint employees and consultants. To appoint 5    such actuarial, medical, legal, investigational, clerical 6    or financial employees and consultants as are necessary, 7    and fix their compensation.8        (i) To make rules. To make rules and regulations 9    necessary for the administration of the affairs of the 10    Fund.11        (j) To waive guardianship. To waive the requirement of 12    legal guardianship of a person under legal disability or 13    any minor unmarried beneficiary of the Fund for a 14    representative managing such person or beneficiary's 15    affairs, whenever the Board deems such waiver to be in the 16    best interest of the person or beneficiary.17        (k) To collect amounts due. To collect any amounts due 18    to the Fund from any participant or beneficiary prior to 19    payment of any annuity, benefit or refund.20        (l) To invoke rule of offset. To offset against any 21    amount payable to an employee or to any other person such 22    sums as may be due to the Fund or may have been paid by the 23    Fund due to misrepresentation, fraud or error.24        (m) To assess and collect interest on amounts due to 25    the Fund using the annual rate as shall from time to time 26    be determined by the Board, compounded annually from the   SB1421- 9 -LRB104 07674 RPS 17718 b1    date of notification to the date of payment. 2(Source: P.A. 103-523, eff. 1-1-24.)